apertium-scn.scn.dix
    <pardef n="cerc/u__vblex">
    	<e><p><l>u</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>hi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>a</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>a</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>anu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>unu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
    <pardef n="cèrc/anu__vblex">
        <e><p><l>anu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>a</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
    <pardef n="pricèd/iri__vblex">
      	<e><p><l>iri</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìri</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p></e>

      	<e><p><l>ìri</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>iri</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>

        <e><p><l>unu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>inu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>iunu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
    <pardef n="priced/u__vblex">
    	<e><p><l>u</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>unu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>inu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>iunu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="accèdiri"><i>accèd</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="addipènniri" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>addipenn</l><r>addipènn</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="addipènniri"><i>addipènn</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="addivèrtiri"><i>addivèrt</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="addivèrtiri"><p><l>addivert</l><r>addivèrt</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="allungari"><p><l>allong</l><r>allung</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="allungari"><p><l>allòng</l><r>allung</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arricircari"><p><l>arricerc</l><r>arricirc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arricircari"><p><l>arricèrc</l><r>arricirc</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fabbricari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>fàbbric</l><r>fabbric</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fabbricari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>fabbrìc</l><r>fabbric</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="frabbricari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>fràbbic</l><r>frabbic</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="frabbricari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>frabbìc</l><r>frabbic</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="significari" r="LR"><p><l>signìfic</l><r>signific</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="significari" r="LR"><p><l>signifìc</l><r>signific</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pricèdiri"><i>pricèd</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="richèdiri"><par n="ri/re"/><i>chèd</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="richèdiri"><p><l>riched</l><r>richèd</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="succèdiri"><i>succèd</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cèdiri"><i>cèd</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="procèdiri"><i>procèd</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ricèviri"><par n="ri/re"/><i>cèv</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ripètiri"><par n="ri/re"/><i>pèt</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ripètiri" r="LR" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>arripèt</l><r>ripèt</r></p><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sèntiri"><i>sènt</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dòrmiri"><i>dòrm</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="risòrviri"><par n="ri/re"/><i>sòrv</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="risòrviri" r="LR"><p><l>arrisòrv</l><r>risòrv</r></p><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vèstiri"><i>vèst</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="difènniri"><i>difènn</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="difènniri" r="LR"><p><l>addifènn</l><r>difènn</r></p><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="percèpiri"><i>percèp</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arriscèdiri"><i>arriscèd</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cuncèdiri"><i>cuncèd</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mòviri"><i>mòv</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prumòviri"><i>prumòv</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="divèrtiri"><i>divèrt</i><par n="pricèd/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ligari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>leg</l><r>lig</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ligari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>lèg</l><r>lig</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="culligari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>culleg</l><r>cullig</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="culligari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>cullèg</l><r>cullig</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iucari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>ioc</l><r>iuc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iucari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>iòc</l><r>iuc</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iucari" a="BonnerDict" r="LR"><p><l>joc</l><r>iuc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iucari" a="BonnerDict" r="LR"><p><l>jòc</l><r>iuc</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iucari" a="BonnerDict" r="LR"><p><l>gioc</l><r>iuc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iucari" a="BonnerDict" r="LR"><p><l>giòc</l><r>iuc</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="appiricari"><p><l>appirec</l><r>appiric</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="circari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>cerc</l><r>circ</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="circari" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>cèrc</l><r>circ</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ncircari"><p><l>ncerc</l><r>ncirc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ncircari"><p><l>ncèrc</l><r>ncirc</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ricircari"><p><l>ricerc</l><r>ricirc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ricircari"><p><l>ricèrc</l><r>ricirc</r></p><par n="cèrc/anu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tuccari"><p><l>tocc</l><r>tucc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stuccari"><p><l>stocc</l><r>stucc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nfucari"><p><l>nfoc</l><r>nfuc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ntussicari"><p><l>ntossic</l><r>ntussic</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nvucari"><p><l>nvoc</l><r>nvuc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rituccari"><p><l>ritocc</l><r>ritucc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sbummicari"><p><l>sbommic</l><r>sbummic</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scuncicari"><p><l>sconcic</l><r>scuncic</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sfugari"><p><l>sfog</l><r>sfug</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vucari"><p><l>voc</l><r>vuc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bìviri" r="LR"><p><l>bev</l><r>bìv</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dìciri"><p><l>dec</l><r>dìc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mintiri" r="LR"><p><l>ment</l><r>mint</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="friscari"><p><l>fresc</l><r>frisc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vìriri" r="LR"><p><l>ver</l><r>vìr</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ntirrugari"><p><l>ntirrog</l><r>ntirrug</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lucari"><p><l>loc</l><r>luc</r></p><par n="cerc/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chiuppiri"><p><l>chiopp</l><r>chiupp</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="liiri"><p><l>le</l><r>li</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cinniri"><p><l>cenn</l><r>cinn</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="puliri"><p><l>pol</l><r>pul</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pricèdiri" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>priced</l><r>pricèd</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="succèdiri" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>succed</l><r>succèd</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cèdiri" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>ced</l><r>cèd</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="procèdiri" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>proced</l><r>procèd</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ricèviri" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>ricev</l><r>ricèv</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ripètiri" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>ripet</l><r>ripèt</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sèntiri"><p><l>sent</l><r>sènt</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dòrmiri"><p><l>dorm</l><r>dòrm</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="risòrviri"><p><l>risorv</l><r>risòrv</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vèstiri"><p><l>vest</l><r>vèst</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="difènniri"><p><l>difenn</l><r>difènn</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="percèpiri"><p><l>percep</l><r>percèp</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arriscèdiri"><p><l>arrisced</l><r>arriscèd</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cuncèdiri"><p><l>cunced</l><r>cuncèd</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prumòviri"><p><l>prumov</l><r>prumòv</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="divèrtiri"><p><l>divert</l><r>divèrt</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="risòrviri" r="LR"><p><l>arrisorv</l><r>risòrv</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ripètiri" a="BonnerDict" r="LR"><p><l>arrripet</l><r>ripèt</r></p><par n="priced/u__vblex"/></e>
